Hawaii, session 2026, HB762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201H-203, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§201H-203[]] Eligible applicants for funds.  [Eligible applicants] To be eligible for funds, applicants shall [include nonprofit and for-profit organizations, limited liability companies, partnerships, and government] be: (1)  Organizations that are required to use all financial surplus to develop additional housing in the State; or (2)  Government agencies[, who are]. Eligible applicants shall also be qualified in accordance with rules adopted by the corporation pursuant to chapter 91." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________